Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1738HV (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. 512 Section 1. Section 537.2501, subsection 1, paragraph e, 1 subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (5) Fees or charges listed in section 535.8, subsection 4 , 3 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ . If a creditor that is a mortgage banker 4 licensed under section 535B.5 or registered under section 5 535B.3 makes a consumer loan secured by an interest in land 6 in which the points and fees the borrower is charged by all 7 lenders in connection with the loan do not exceed the amounts 8 specified in 12 C.F.R. Â§1026.43(e)(3), the consumer loan shall 9 not be subject to section 535.8, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ , 10 or section 535.8, subsection 5. 11 Sec. 2. Section 537.2501, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 12 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 13 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) Discount points for the purpose of 14 reducing, and that result in a bona fide reduction of, the 15 interest rate or time-price differential applicable to the 16 loan. 17 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) Points, agreed upon by the creditor 18 and borrower, to offer a given interest rate. 19